Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1579.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriations; department of administration; pilot program expansion; local law enforcement agencies; exemption A. The following amounts are appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the department of administration to distribute to the following entities to expand participation in the pilot program to connect the records management systems and computer-aided dispatch systems pursuant to Laws 2024, chapter 209, section 127: 1. Arizona state university police department        $ 64,900 2. Department of public safety                       $ 574,000 3. University of Arizona police department           $ 64,900 4. Northern Arizona university police department     $ 52,800 5. Pinal county sheriff's office                     $ 500,000 6. Pima county sheriff's office                      $ 171,800 7. Coconino county sheriff's office                  $ 47,800 8. Phoenix police department                         $ 343,000 9. Glendale police department                        $ 131,300 10. Buckeye police department                        $ 66,000 11. Paradise Valley police department                $ 55,000 12. Tucson police department                         $ 237,000 13. Mesa police department                           $ 300,000 14. Chandler police department                       $ 111,700 15. Peoria police department                         $ 83,900 16. Avondale police department                       $ 72,500 17. Goodyear police department                       $ 69,200 18. Flagstaff police department                      $ 82,500 19. Oro Valley police department                     $ 67,000 20. Marana police department                         $ 65,000 21. El Mirage police department                      $ 55,000 22. Maricopa county sheriff's office                 $ 220,000 23. Yavapai county sheriff's office                  $ 84,000 24. Cochise county sheriff's office                  $ 78,000 25. Navajo county sheriff's office                   $ 100,000 26. Gilbert police department                        $ 102,000 27. Prescott police department                       $ 67,000 28. Prescott Valley police department                $ 54,000 29. Sierra Vista police department                   $ 44,200 30. Sahuarita police department                      $ 54,000 31. Coolidge police department                       $ 44,200 32. Show Low police department                       $ 44,200 33. South Tucson police department                   $ 50,700 34. Cottonwood police department                     $ 54,000 35. Sedona police department                         $ 38,000 36. Winslow police department                        $ 38,600 37. Camp Verde marshal's office                      $ 35,000 38. Chino Valley police department                   $ 35,000 39. Wickenburg police department                     $ 35,000 40. Snowflake-Taylor police department               $ 25,000 41. Pinetop-Lakeside police department               $ 21,700 42. Williams police department                       $ 20,000 43. Youngtown police services                        $ 20,000 44. Bisbee police department                         $ 20,000 45. Holbrook police department                       $ 20,000 46. Clarkdale police department                      $ 20,000 47. Huachuca City police department                  $ 20,000 48. Jerome police department                         $ 20,000 49. Douglas police department                        $ 55,000 50. Benson police department                         $ 20,000 51. Willcox police department                        $ 20,000 52. Tombstone police department                      $ 20,000 B. The appropriation made in subsection A of this section is exempt from the provisions of section 35-190, Arizona Revised Statutes, relating to lapsing of appropriations.